Nevada, session 83, SB140.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 62B.700 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
62B.700 1. The juvenile court may establish an appropriate
program for the treatment of children diagnosed with or suspected to
have autism spectrum disorders or neurobehavioral disorders
associated with prenatal exposure to alcohol or a controlled
substance to which it may assign a child who is alleged or
adjudicated to have committed a delinquent act if the child:
(a) Is diagnosed with, including, without limitation, through the
use of a standardized assessment, or suspected to have an autism
spectrum disorder [;] or neurobehavioral disorder associated with
prenatal exposure to alcohol or a controlled substance;
(b) Would benefit from assignment to the program; and
(c) Is not ineligible for assignment to the program pursuant to
any other provision of law.
2. The assignment of a child who is alleged or adjudicated to
have committed a delinquent act to a program pursuant to this
section must:
(a) Include:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(1) The terms and conditions for successful completion of the
program; and
(2) The terms and conditions of the informal supervision or
probation of the child, if applicable.
(b) Provide for progress reports at intervals set by the juvenile
court to ensure that the child is making satisfactory progress towards
completion of the program.
3. As used in this section [, “autism] :
(a) “Autism spectrum disorder” means a condition that meets
the diagnostic criteria for autism spectrum disorder published in the
current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental
Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association or the
edition thereof that was in effect at the time the condition was
diagnosed or determined.
(b) “Neurobehavioral disorder associated with prenatal
exposure to alcohol or a controlled substance” means a condition
that meets the diagnostic criteria for a neurobehavioral disorder
associated with prenatal exposure to alcohol or controlled
substances published in the current edition of the Diagnostic and
Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American
Psychiatric Association or the edition thereof that was in effect at
the time the condition was diagnosed or determined. The term
includes, without limitation, fetal alcohol spectrum disorders and
neonatal abstinence syndrome.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)